Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.310

Notice of infraction—Issuance.

The county noxious weed control board may issue a notice of civil infraction if after investigation it has reasonable cause to believe an infraction has been committed. A civil infraction may be issued pursuant to RCW 7.80.005, 7.80.070 through 7.80.110, 7.80.120 (3) and (4), and 7.80.130 through 7.80.900.

[ 1997 c 353 s 30; 1987 c 438 s 24.]